apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="Sa/n__n">
  <e><p><l>in-s</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>in-s</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inse</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inse</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>na-s</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nasa</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Sandair__np">
  <e><p><l>Sandair</l>   <r>Sandair<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSandair</l>  <r>Sandair<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Sandal__np">
  <e><p><l>Sandal</l>    <r>Sandal<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSandail</l>  <r>Sandal<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Sanfort__np">
  <e><p><l>Sanfort</l>   <r>Sanfort<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSanfoirt</l> <r>Sanfort<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saobhard__np">
  <e><p><l>Saobhard</l>  <r>Saobhard<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaobhaird</l><r>Saobhard<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saoghair__np">
  <e><p><l>Saoghair</l>  <r>Saoghair<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaoghair</l> <r>Saoghair<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saoghar__np">
  <e><p><l>Saoghar</l>   <r>Saoghar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaoghair</l> <r>Saoghar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saograobh__np">
  <e><p><l>Saograobh</l> <r>Saograobh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaograoibh</l><r>Saograobh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saográbh__np">
  <e><p><l>Saográbh</l>  <r>Saográbh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaográibh</l><r>Saográbh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saoi__np">
  <e><p><l>Saoi</l>      <r>Saoi<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaoi</l>     <r>Saoi<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saoir__np">
  <e><p><l>Saoir</l>     <r>Saoir<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaoir</l>    <r>Saoir<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saomar__np">
  <e><p><l>Saomar</l>    <r>Saomar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaomair</l>  <r>Saomar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saomhar__np">
  <e><p><l>Saomhar</l>   <r>Saomhar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaomhair</l> <r>Saomhar<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saoraí__np">
  <e><p><l>Saoraí</l>    <r>Saoraí<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaoraí</l>   <r>Saoraí<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Saraí__np">
  <e><p><l>Saraí</l>     <r>Saraí<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSaraí</l>    <r>Saraí<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S/asana__np">
  <e><p><l>asana</l>     <r>asana<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asana</l>     <r>asana<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>asana</l>     <r>asana<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>hasana</l>    <r>asana<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/Sasanaigh__np">
  <e><p><l>Sasanaigh</l> <r>Sasanaigh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tSasanaigh</l><r>Sasanaigh<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Sata/rn__n">
  <e><p><l>irn-s</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irn-s</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irn</l>       <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irn</l>       <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irnse</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irnse</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rn-s</l>      <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rn-s</l>      <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rn</l>        <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rn</l>        <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rna-s</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rna</l>       <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rnasa</l>     <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rnsa</l>      <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>rnsa</l>      <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Sco/t__n">
  <e><p><l>it-s</l>      <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>it-s</l>      <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>it</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>it</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of Sco/t__n -->
  <e><p><l>itse</l>      <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>itse</l>      <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>t-s</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>t-s</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="San"><i>Sa</i><par n="Sa/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sandair"><i></i><par n="/Sandair__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sandal"><i></i><par n="/Sandal__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sanfort"><i></i><par n="/Sanfort__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saobhard"><i></i><par n="/Saobhard__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saoghair"><i></i><par n="/Saoghair__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saoghar"><i></i><par n="/Saoghar__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saograobh"><i></i><par n="/Saograobh__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saográbh"><i></i><par n="/Saográbh__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saoi"><i></i><par n="/Saoi__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saoir"><i></i><par n="/Saoir__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saomar"><i></i><par n="/Saomar__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saomhar"><i></i><par n="/Saomhar__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saoraí"><i></i><par n="/Saoraí__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saraí"><i></i><par n="/Saraí__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sasana"><i>S</i><par n="S/asana__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sasanaigh"><i></i><par n="/Sasanaigh__np"/></e>
<e lm="Satarn"><i>Sata</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="Satharn"><i>Satha</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="Scot"><i>Sco</i><par n="Sco/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="carn"><i>ca</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="ciolarn"><i>ciola</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="corn"><i>co</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="dorn"><i>do</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="forrán"><i>forrá</i><par n="Sa/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="raonchorn"><i>raoncho</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="sacschorn"><i>sacscho</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="scorn"><i>sco</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="son"><i>so</i><par n="Sa/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="sorn"><i>so</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
<e lm="turn"><i>tu</i><par n="Sata/rn__n"/></e>
